Utah statutes.
53-7-411.   Local regulation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a political subdivision of this state may neither enact nor enforce any ordinance or other local law or regulation conflicting with, or preempted by, any provision of this part or with any policy of this state expressed by this part, whether that policy be expressed by inclusion of a provision in this part or by exclusion of that subject from this part.

